Rhode Island, session 2025, SB915.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-62 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-62. National Guard plates.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to
make available to all active and retired members of the Rhode Island Army and Air National Guard
a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an
automobile or a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.)
or less. Upon the death of the holder of “National Guard” plates, the plates may be transferred to
the surviving spouse of the member of the National Guard for the spouse’s lifetime or until the
spouse remarries.
(b) The special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry on it the designation “National
Guard” and shall also carry on it an emblem on the left-hand side of the plate to be designed and
provided by the office of the adjutant general, with the numerals to the right of it.
(c) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon the
payment of a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00)
for the plate. All revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.
(d) For the purposes of this section an active or retired member of the Rhode Island Army
and Air National Guard shall be defined as any person certified by the adjutant general as currently
serving or having retired under honorable conditions in either the Rhode Island Army or Air

National Guard.
(e)(d) In a state of emergency, any active member of the Army or Air National Guard
driving a vehicle bearing the special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and
empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by
any state or municipal authority.
(e) The applicant shall not be required to pay a registration fee or service charge for the
plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002631
========
LC002631 - Page 2 of 3